Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1009
Chief of transportation services bureau; appointment; qualifications.

The Director of Administrative Services shall appoint as chief of the transportation services bureau any person who has had not less than three years' experience in a position or positions which include responsibility for management, purchase, lease or control of a system of transportation for a private or governmental enterprise. No person shall hold the position of chief of the transportation services bureau who is directly or indirectly interested in any company engaged in furnishing transportation services or equipment, except that an investment in stock of such a company in an amount determined by the director to be insignificant shall not be considered disqualifying.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 2, p. 2919.